Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1235
Employer; retaliation or discrimination prohibited.

An employer shall not retaliate or discriminate against an employee because the employee:

(1) Files a suit or complaint under the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act; or

(2) Testifies, assists, or participates in an investigation, proceeding, or action concerning a violation of the act.

Laws 2020, LB1016, § 3.